Utah statutes.
63B-11-701.   Revenue bond authorizations.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell,
and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University
of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of the
University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to refinance
the cost of acquiring, constructing, furnishing, and equipping the East-Campus
Central Plant and related energy improvements;
(b)  savings in heating and cooling costs be used as the primary revenue
source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this
section; and
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may provide up to $33,000,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay
costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve
requirements.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Utah State University, issue, sell,
and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Utah State
University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of Utah State
University, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost
of acquiring, constructing, furnishing, and equipping research and office
facilities at its Research Park;
(b)  revenues from research activities, the Utah State University Research
Foundation, and other institutional funds be used as the primary revenue
source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this
section; and
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may provide up to $19,000,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay
costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve
requirements.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Southern Utah University, issue, sell,
and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Southern Utah
University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of Southern
Utah University, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the
cost of acquiring, constructing, furnishing, and equipping a Student Living
and Learning Facility;
(b)  student housing and other auxiliary revenues and student building fees be
used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any obligation created
under authority of this section; and
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may provide up to $9,000,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay
costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve
requirements.
(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Snow College, issue, sell, and deliver
revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Snow College to borrow
money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of Snow College, other than
appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of acquiring,
constructing, furnishing, and equipping a Multi-Event Center in Richfield;
(b)  usage fees and other operating revenues be used as the primary revenue
source for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this
section; and
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section
may provide up to $2,500,000, together with other amounts necessary to pay
costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve
requirements.
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership
Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building
Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or
arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be
created, to provide up to $1,836,000 for the acquisition of a site and
construction of a store in Tooele for the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance,
pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.
